Connecticut, session 2026, SB00481.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"nursing home" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-490 of
the general statutes, and (2) "ownership entity" means an individual or
publicly traded or non-publicly traded company that collects capital
investments from individuals or entities and purchases a direct or
indirect ownership share of a nursing home, and includes a real estate
investment trust, as defined in 26 USC 856, as amended from time to
time.
(b) Not later than February 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, each
nursing home shall provide the Commissioner of Social Services with
the following information: (1) The name and business address of all
ownership entities with a beneficial ownership interest in the nursing
home and a statement of whether the ownership entity is an individual,
partnership, corporation or other legal entity; (2) the names of the
officers, directors, trustees or managing and general partners of any
such ownership entity and the number of shares owned or ownership
percentage of the ownership entity held by each partner; (3) if such
ownership entity is a corporation that is incorporated in another state, a
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 481
certificate of good standing from the Secretary of the State of the state of
incorporation; (4) the audited and certified financial statements of the
ownership entity, if applicable, including, but not limited to, (A) a
balance sheet as of the end of the most recent fiscal year, (B) income
statements for the most recent fiscal year, (C) a cash flow statement from
the most recent fiscal year, and (D) an estimate of financing expenses,
legal expenses, land costs, marketing costs and other similar costs that
the ownership entity expects to incur or become obligated to pay within
one year of acquisition of the nursing home; (5) a description of any
mortgage loan or other financing used for the initial acquisition or
construction of the nursing home, subsequent refinancing of any debt,
and any subsequent financing of additional debt incurred, including,
but not limited to, the terms and costs of any such mortgage loan or
other financing; (6) a copy of the purchase agreement for the nursing
home and any agreement providing for the transfer of ownership
interests in the nursing home, including, but not limited to, the real
estate agreement, asset agreement, stock agreement or other similar
agreement; and (7) any documentation regarding escrow or contingency
accounts.
(c) The Commissioner of Social Services may impose a civil penalty
of one thousand dollars per day on any nursing home that fails to
provide any information required pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section not later than thirty days after the date such information is due.
A nursing home may request a fair hearing on the assessment of any
such civil penalty as an aggrieved person pursuant to section 17b-60 of
the general statutes.
(d) A nursing home owned or partially owned by an ownership
entity with a beneficial ownership interest in the nursing home shall, at
the time of application for or renewal of a nursing home license,
demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Commissioner of Social Services
that the nursing home has secured a performance bond or similar form
of security in favor of the state in an amount equal to ninety days of
operating costs for the nursing home and that such bond or similar form
of security shall remain in effect for the duration of the initial license
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 481
term and any renewal term.
(e) A nursing home owned or partially owned by an ownership entity
with a beneficial ownership interest in the nursing home shall, at the
time of application for or renewal of a nursing home license, submit to
the Department of Public Health a copy of the performance bond or
similar form of security required under subsection (d) of this section.
(f) No person or entity acquiring ownership of real property on and
after October 1, 2026, on which a licensed nursing home operates, shall
sell, transfer or otherwise convey such property within five years of the
date of acquisition without written approval from the Commissioner of
Public Health. Such approval shall be granted only upon a showing that
the sale will benefit resident care or improve operational stability.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective from passage) No nursing home, as defined in
section 19a-490 of the general statutes, shall require a resident or
prospective resident to sign an arbitration agreement or contract
containing an arbitration agreement as a condition of admission or
continued care. Any such required arbitration agreement or contract
containing such arbitration agreement entered into, amended or
renewed after the effective date of this section is against public policy
and shall be void.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed; and Section 1(d) and Section 1(e) were redrafted
for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3